New Mexico, session 2026, HB307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of Chapter 57 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] ADVERTISING FOR LEGAL SERVICES--SETTLEMENT AND JUDGMENT AMOUNTS--DISCLOSURE OF ATTORNEY FEES--CIVIL PENALTY--ENFORCEMENT.-- A. When an advertisement by an attorney or a law firm for legal services includes a monetary amount awarded to a client for a settlement or judgment of a civil action, the advertisement shall also disclose the monetary amount that was charged to the client for the services rendered for the civil action. B. The attorney general shall assess an attorney or a law firm that violates this section a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation. C. The attorney general or, with the attorney general's permission, a district attorney in a district in which an advertisement in violation of this section is broadcast or published may bring a civil action in district court to recover a civil penalty assessed pursuant to this section. D. Civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the current school fund." SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the provisions of this act is July 1, 2027. - 2 -